North Carolina, session 2025, HB32.
General Assembly of North Carolina enacts:
SECTION 1.(a) Sections 3.1, 3.2, and 3.3 of the Charter of the Town of China
Grove, being S.L. 2002-42, read as rewritten:
"Section 3.1. Regular Municipal Elections. Regular municipal elections shall be held at the
time of the general election in each odd-numbered year. even-numbered year. Except as
otherwise provided, the election shall be conducted in accordance with the uniform municipal
election laws of North Carolina. Elections shall be conducted on a nonpartisan plurality basis and
the results determined using the nonpartisan plurality method as provided in G.S. 163-292.
"Section 3.2. Election of Aldermen. The Town shall continue to have staggered terms for its
Aldermen. Two Aldermen shall be elected at the regular municipal election in 2003 to four-year
terms and quadrennially thereafter. Three Aldermen shall be elected at the regular municipal
election in 2005 to four-year terms and quadrennially thereafter.for staggered four-year terms.
"Section 3.3. Election of Mayor. A Mayor shall be elected in the regular municipal election
in 2003 and quadrennially thereafter.for a four-year term."
SECTION 1.(b) No municipal elections shall be conducted in the Town of China
Grove in 2025. The terms of office for the three Aldermen serving on the effective date of this
act whose terms are set to expire in 2025 shall be extended by one year. The terms of office for
the two Aldermen and the Mayor serving on the effective date of this act whose terms are set to
expire in 2027 are extended by one year. Regular municipal elections in the Town of China Grove
shall resume in even-numbered years beginning in 2026 with the same staggering of terms as
when elections were conducted in the odd-numbered years.
SECTION 2. This act is effective when it becomes law and applies to elections held
on or after that date.
*H32-v-2*